csv2fst/yaml_output/VTA_CNJ_Regular.yaml
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: waabamigosiiwaanen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: waabamigowaanen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: waabamigosiiwegwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: waabamigowegwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: waabamigosiiwanen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: waabamigowanen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: waabamigosiiwaagwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: waabamigowaagwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamigosiinigwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamigonigwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: waabamigosiigwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: waabamigogwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: waabamigosiiwaangen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: waabamigowaangen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: waabamigosiiwangen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: waabamigowangen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: waabamisinowagoogwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: waabaminagoogwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: waabamisiinowaanen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: waabaminowaanen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx: [waabamaasiwaawagwaawen,waabamaasiiwagwaawen]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx: waabamaawagwaawen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: [waabamimaasiwaawagen,waabamimaasiiwagen]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaawagen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: [waabamaasiwaawagen,waabamaasiiwagen]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: waabamaawagen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: waabamisiiwegwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: waabamiwegwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx: [waabamaasiwaawegwaawen,waabamaasiiwegwaawen]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx: waabamaawegwaawen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: [waabamimaasiwaawegwen,waabamimaasiiwegwen]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaawegwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: [waabamaasiwaawegwen,waabamaasiiwaaweg]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: waabamaawegwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+Excl: waabamisiiwaangen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+Excl: waabamiwaangen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: waabamisiiwanen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: waabamiwanen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx: [waabamaasiwaawadwaawen,waabamaasiiwadwaawen]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx: waabamaawadwaawen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: [waabamimaasiwaawaden,waabamimaasiiwaden]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaawaden
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: [waabamaasiwaawaden,waabamaasiiwaden]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: waabamaawaden
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+Excl: waabamisiiwaangen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+Excl: waabamiwaangen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: waabamisiiwaagwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: waabamiwaagwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: waabamigoosiiwegwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: waabamigoowegwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: waabamisiinowegwaawen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: waabaminowegwaawen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: [waabamaasiwaawaagwen,waabamaasiiwaagwen]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamaawaagwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: waabamisiiwangidwaawen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: waabamiwangidwaawen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: waabamisiinowangwaawen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: waabaminowangwaawen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: waabamigosiiwaagwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: waabamigowaagwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: waabamigosiigwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: waabamigogwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: waabamisiigwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: waabamigwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: waabamigoosiiwanen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: waabamigoowanen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: waabamisiinowegwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: waabaminowegwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamaasiigwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamaagwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: waabamisiiwangiden
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: waabamiwangiden
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: waabamisiinowangen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: waabaminowangen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Pl: waabamisiinogwaawen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Pl: waabaminogwaawen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Sg: waabamisiinogwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Sg: waabaminogwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+3PlProx: [waabamaasiwaawangidwaawen,waabamaasiiwangidwaawen]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+3PlProx: waabamaawangidwaawen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: [waabamimaasiwaawangiden,waabamimaasiiwangiden]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaawangiden
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: [waabamaasiwaawangiden,waabamaasiiwangiden]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: waabamaawangiden
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+3PlProx: [waabamaasiwaawangwaawen,waabamaasiiwangwaawen]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+3PlProx: waabamaawangwaawen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: [waabamimaasiwaawangen,waabamimaasiiwangen]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaawangen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: [waabamaasiwaawangen,waabamaasiiwangen]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: waabamaawangen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+1Sg: waabamigoosiiwaanen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+1Sg: waabamigoowaanen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+2Pl: waabamigoosiiwegwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+2Pl: waabamigoowegwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+2Sg: waabamigoosiiwanen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+2Sg: waabamigoowanen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+3PlProx: [waabamaasiwaawindwaawen,waabamaasiiwintwaawen]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+3PlProx: waabamaawindwaawen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: [waabamimaasiwaawinden,waabamimaasiiwinden]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaawinden
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+3SgProx: [waabamaasiwaawinden,waabamaasiiwinden]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+3SgProx: waabamaawinden
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+Excl: waabamigoosiiwaangen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+Excl: waabamigoowaangen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+Incl: waabamigoosiiwangen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+Incl: waabamigoowangen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: waabamigosiwaan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: waabamigoyaan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: waabamigosiweg
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: waabamigoyeg
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: waabamigosiwan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: waabamigoyan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: waabamigosigwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: waabamigowaad
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamigosinig
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamigonid
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: waabamigosig
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: waabamigod
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: waabamigosiwaang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: waabamigoyaang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: waabamigosiwang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: waabamigoyang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: waabamisinowagog
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: waabaminagog
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: waabamisinowaan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: waabaminaan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: waabamaasiwagwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: waabamagwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaasiwag
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimag
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: waabamaasiwag
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: waabamag
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: waabamisiweg
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: waabamiyeg
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: waabamaasiwegwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: waabamegwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaasiweg
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimeg
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: waabamaasiweg
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: waabameg
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+Excl: waabamisiwaang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+Excl: waabamiyaang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: waabamisiwan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: waabamiyan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: waabamaasiwadwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: waabamadwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaasiwad
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimad
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: waabamaasiwad
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: waabamad
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+Excl: waabamisiwaang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+Excl: waabamiyaang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: waabamisigwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: waabamiwaad
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: waabamisinowegwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: waabaminegwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: waabamisinokwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: waabamikwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamaasigwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamaawaad
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: waabamisiwangidwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: waabamiyangidwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: waabamisinowangwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: waabaminangwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: waabamigosigwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: waabamigowaad
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: waabamigosig
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: waabamigod
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: waabamisig
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: waabamid
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: waabamisinoweg
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: waabamineg
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: waabamisinok
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: waabamik
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamaasig
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamaad
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: waabamisiwangid
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: waabamiyangid
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: waabamisinowang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: waabaminang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Pl: waabamigosiweg
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Pl: waabamigooyeg
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Sg: waabamigoosiwan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Sg: waabamigooyan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: waabamaasiwangidwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: waabamangidwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaasiwangid
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimangid
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: waabamaasiwangid
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: waabamangid
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: waabamaasiwangwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: waabamangwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaasiwang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: waabamaasiwang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: waabamang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+1Sg: waabamigoosiwaan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+1Sg: waabamigooyaan
